Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.700.100

Entry-level aerospace assembler training program—Grants to high schools—Selection criteria—Data collection by education data center—Reports.

(1)(a) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to high schools to implement a training program to prepare students for employment as entry-level aerospace assemblers. Grant funds must be allocated on a one-time basis and may be used to purchase or improve course curriculum, purchase course equipment, and support professional development for course teachers. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consult and team with the community and technical colleges' center of excellence for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing regarding the developing aerospace program of study and industry career needs. This information must assist the office of the superintendent of public instruction in refining specific aspects to the criteria in (b) of this subsection and leveraging advantages and opportunities for students in selected high schools.

(b) The superintendent of public instruction must select grant recipients based on the criteria in this subsection (1)(b). This is a competitive grant process. Successful high school applicants must:

(i) Demonstrate engaged and committed high school and district leadership and faculty in support of the aerospace assembler program;

(ii) Demonstrate capacity to offer the program and maximize the use of grant resources addressing: Availability of appropriate physical space, meeting program technology requirements, providing projected enrollment from the high school as well as from other area high schools as appropriate, planned hours and days each week the program is to be offered, and other specific program requirements set forth by the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(iii) Demonstrate linkages to programs at local community and technical colleges and private technical schools to provide a seamless pathway for students to continue their education and career preparation beyond high school;

(iv) Demonstrate a history of successful partnerships within the community and partner support for implementing an entry-level aerospace assembler program that includes one or more of the following: Apprenticeships, supplying materials, instruction support, internships, mentorships, and other program components;

(v) Provide the plan for program implementation that includes a beginning date for first classes as well as plans for recruiting and retaining students in the course; and

(vi) Demonstrate capacity to continue the program in years succeeding the initial grant year.

(2) The education data center in the office of financial management must collect aerospace assembler program student participation and completion data for grant recipient high schools. The center must follow students to employment or further training and education in the two years following the students' completion of the program. Findings must be reported beginning in January 2014 and each January thereafter through January 2018 to the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, other appropriate state agencies, and the appropriate education and fiscal committees of the legislature.

[ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 2nd sp.s. c 1: "The legislature finds that careers in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) are critically important to the state's economy and will grow in importance in the future. The vitality of STEM product and process development, manufacturing, international trade, and research are dependent on a well-educated, trained, creative workforce. The legislature also finds that there are current employment opportunities and projected high employer demands in STEM careers. The legislature further finds that the interdisciplinary connections of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics taught in integrated, applied, and hands-on courses not only deepens content understanding but also extends and expands that learning to thoughtful and creative problem-solving practices on the assembly line, in the laboratory, and at the drawing board.

It is the intent of the legislature to support STEM education programs to help increase the number of Washingtonians prepared to enter STEM career fields. It is also the intent of the legislature to support courses and programs that begin in high school and build upon one another so that technical certifications and degrees are connected from high schools and skill centers to community and technical colleges and four-year universities." [ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 1.]